Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 5 Office and Agent

7-1.2-501.
Registered office and registered agent — Designation of registered agent without authority.

Each corporation shall have and continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office, which may be, but need not be, the same as its place of business.

A registered agent, who may be:

An individual resident in this state;

A domestic corporation, a domestic limited partnership, a domestic limited-liability partnership, a domestic limited-liability company; or

A foreign corporation, a foreign limited partnership, a foreign limited-liability partnership or a foreign limited-liability company authorized to transact business in this state, in each case, having a business office identical with the office of such registered agent which generally is open during normal business hours to accept service of process and otherwise perform the functions of a registered agent; provided, however, that in the case where the registered agent of a corporation is an attorney, the business address of the agent need not be identical with the registered office, but may be the usual business address of the attorney.

Any incorporator, officer, agent, or servant of a corporation, who designates a registered agent for that corporation without the registered agent’s authority, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment of not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-502.
Change of registered office or registered agent.

A corporation may change its registered office or change its registered agent, or both, upon filing in the office of the secretary of state a statement stating:

The name of the corporation.

The address of its then registered office.

If the address of its registered office has changed, the new address of the registered office.

The name of its then registered agent.

If its registered agent has changed, the name of its successor registered agent.

The address of its registered office and the address of the business office of its registered agent, as changed.

The statement must be executed by the corporation by its authorized representative, and delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the statement conforms to the provisions of this chapter, the secretary of state shall file the statement in his office, and upon that filing or upon a later date not more than thirty (30) days after the filing, as is set forth in the statement, the change of address of the registered office, or the appointment of a new registered agent, or both, as the case may be, becomes effective.

Any registered agent of a corporation may resign as an agent upon filing a written notice of the resignation with the secretary of state, who shall immediately notify the corporation of the resignation at its registered office. The appointment of the agent terminates upon the expiration of thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice by the secretary of state.

If a registered agent changes his or her or its business address to another place within the state, he or she or it may change the address and the address of the registered office of any corporations of which he or she or it is a registered agent by filing a statement as required above, except that it need be signed only by the registered agent and need not be responsive to subsection (a)(5) and must recite that a copy of the statement has been mailed to each corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-503.
Service of process on corporation.

The registered agent appointed by a corporation is an agent of the corporation upon whom any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the corporation may be served.

Whenever a corporation fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, then the secretary of state is an agent of the corporation upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served. Service on the secretary of state of any process, notice, or demand is made by delivering to and leaving with him or her or with any clerk having charge of the corporation department of his or her office, duplicate copies of the process, notice, or demand. In the event any process, notice, or demand is served on the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall immediately forward one of the copies by certified mail, addressed to the corporation at its registered office. Any service upon the secretary of state is returnable in not less than thirty (30) days.

The secretary of state shall maintain a record of any such service setting forth the name of the plaintiff and defendant, the title, docket number and nature of the proceeding in which process has been served upon the secretary of state, the fact that service has been effected pursuant to this subsection, the return date thereof, and the day and hour when the service was made. The secretary of state shall not be required to retain such information for a period longer than five (5) years from receipt of the service of process.

Nothing contained in these provisions limits or affects the right to serve any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a corporation in any other manner permitted by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.